Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7708
Adverse action; notice requirements.

If an insurer takes an adverse action based upon credit information, the insurer must meet the notice requirements of both subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section. Such insurer shall:

(1) Provide notification to the consumer that an adverse action has been taken, in accordance with the requirements of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, as such act existed on January 1, 2003, 15 U.S.C. 1681m(a); and

(2) Provide notification to the consumer explaining the reason for the adverse action. The reasons must be provided in sufficiently clear and specific language so that a person can identify the basis for the insurer's decision to take an adverse action. Such notification shall include a description of up to four factors that were the primary influences of the adverse action. The use of generalized terms such as poor credit history, poor credit rating, or poor insurance score does not meet the explanation requirements of this subdivision. Standardized credit explanations provided by consumer reporting agencies or other third-party vendors are deemed to comply with this section.

Laws 2003, LB 487, § 8.